Washington statutes.
RCW 42.40.035

Duty of correctness—Penalties for false information.

An employee must make a reasonable attempt to ascertain the correctness of the information furnished and may be subject to disciplinary actions, including, but not limited to, suspension or termination, for knowingly furnishing false information as determined by the employee's appointing authority.

[ 1999 c 361 s 2.]